nhe.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<v%>                ! Verbo

%<abs%>              ! Forma absoluta
%<af%>               ! Afectivo
%<dim%>              ! Diminutivo


%<pl%>               ! PluraL no poseido
%<plps%>             ! Plural poseido singular
%<plpp%>             ! Plural poseido plural

%<px1pl%>            ! Posesivo 1era plural
%<px1sg%>            ! Posesivo 1era singular
%<px2pl%>            ! Posesivo 2da plural
%<px2sg%>            ! Posesivo 2da singular
%<px3pl%>            ! Posesivo 3ra plural
%<px3sg%>            ! Posesivo 3ra singular

@U.POSS.SG@          ! Posesivo singular
@U.POSS.PL@          ! Posesivo plural
@D.POSS@

@U.S_NBR.PL@
@U.S_NBR.SG@

%<suj1sg%>           ! Sujeto 1ra singular
%<suj2sg%>           ! Sujeto 2da singular
%<suj3sg%>           ! Sujetos 3ra singular
%<suj1pl%>           ! Sujeto 1ra plural
%<suj2pl%>           ! Sujeto 2da plural
%<suj3pl%>           ! Sujeto 3ra plural

%<apl%>               ! Aplicativo
%{l%}            
LEXICON Root

DIMINUTIVE;
POSSESSIVE;
PERSONA-SUJETO;

STEMS ;

LEXICON V-STEMS
chiwa:chiwa V ; ! "hacer"

LEXICON STEMS

siwa:siwa N-siwa ; ! “mujer”
tlal:tlal N-tlal ; ! “tierra”
a:a N-siwa ; ! "agua"
coyo:coyo N-siwa ; !"coyote"
tli:tli N-siwa ; ! "fuego"
soki:soki N-siwa ; ! "lodo"
kone:kone N-siwa ; ! "niño"
ichpoka:ichpoka N-siwa ; ! "muchacha"
xiwi:xiwi N-siwa ; ! "año"
e:e N-siwa ; ! "frijol"
peta:peta N-siwa ; ! "petate"
papalo:papalo N-siwa ; ! "mariposa"
chapol:chapol N-tlal ; ! "chapulin"
mil:mil N-tlal ; ! "milpa"
mes:mes N-mes ; ! "luna"
amoch:amoch N-mes ; ! "libro"
pok:pok N-mes ; ! "humo"
tenamas:tenamas N-mes ; ! "piedra de fogata"
tekomi:tekomi N-siwa ; ! "jicara"
tenami:tenami N-siwa ; ! "muro"

LEXICON PERSONA-SUJETO
@U.S_NBR.SG@%<suj1sg%>:@U.S_NBR.SG@ni%> PERSONA-OBJETO ;
@U.S_NBR.SG@%<suj2sg%>:@U.S_NBR.SG@ti%> PERSONA-OBJETO  ;
@U.S_NBR.SG@%<suj3sg%>:@U.S_NBR.SG@%> PERSONA-OBJETO  ;
@U.S_NBR.PL@%<suj1pl%>:@U.S_NBR.PL@ti%> PERSONA-OBJETO  ;
@U.S_NBR.PL@%<suj2pl%>:@U.S_NBR.PL@in%> PERSONA-OBJETO  ;
@U.S_NBR.PL@%<suj3pl%>:@U.S_NBR.PL@%> PERSONA-OBJETO  ;

LEXICON PERSONA-OBJETO
%<obj1sg%>:nech%> VERBO-DIR ;
%<obj2sg%>:mits%> VERBO-DIR ;
%<obj3sg%>:ki%> VERBO-DIR;
%<obj1pl%>:tech%> VERBO-DIR ;
%<obj2pl%>:imech%> VERBO-DIR ;
%<obj3pl%>:kin%> VERBO-DIR ;

LEXICON VERBO-DIR

%<ill%>:on%> V-STEMS ;
%<all%>:wa꞉l%> V-STEMS ;

LEXICON V
%<v%>: VERBO-APL ;
LEXICON VERBO-APL
%<apl%>:%>%{l%}ia VERBO-NUM;

LEXICON VERBO-NUM


@U.S_NBR.SG@:@U.S_NBR.SG@ # ;
@U.S_NBR.PL@:@U.S_NBR.PL@%>h # ;

LEXICON N-tlal

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>li # ;
%<n%>: FLEXION ;

LEXICON N-siwa

@D.POSS@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.POSS@%>tl # ;
%<n%>: FLEXION ;

LEXICON N-mes

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>tli # ;
%<n%>: FLEXION ;

LEXICON FLEXION
@D.POSS@%<pl%>:@D.POSS@%>me # ;
%<af%>:%>tsi # ;
@D.POSS@%<pl%>%<af%>:@D.POSS@%>tsitsi # ;
@U.POSS.SG@%<plps%>:@U.POSS.SG@%>wa # ;
@U.POSS.PL@%<plpp%>:@U.POSS.PL@%>wah # ;



LEXICON DIMINUTIVE
%<dim%>:pil%> STEMS ;
              STEMS ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVE
@U.POSS.SG@%<px1sg%>:@U.POSS.SG@no%> DIMINUTIVE ;
@U.POSS.SG@%<px2sg%>:@U.POSS.SG@mo%> DIMINUTIVE ;
@U.POSS.SG@%<px3sg%>:@U.POSS.SG@i%> DIMINUTIVE ;
@U.POSS.PL@%<px1pl%>:@U.POSS.PL@to%> DIMINUTIVE ;
@U.POSS.PL@%<px2pl%>:@U.POSS.PL@imo%> DIMINUTIVE ;
@U.POSS.PL@%<px3pl%>:@U.POSS.PL@in%> DIMINUTIVE ;
